Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 2. Alaska Division of Tourism.

Administrative Code. —

For division of tourism, see 3 AAC, part 8.

Sec. 44.33.119.
Purposes.

The purposes of AS

44.33.119

—

44.33.136

are to

encourage the expansion and growth of the state’s visitor industry for the benefit of the citizens of the state;

ensure that the economic benefits to be derived from tourism in the state are retained in the state, to the greatest extent possible;

ensure that a maximum number of residents of the state are employed in the tourism industry;

ensure that consideration is given in the development and implementation of the tourism program to local community goals and objectives, to impacts on existing private enterprises, and to impacts on recreational and subsistence opportunities for the residents of the state;

promote the development of tourism opportunities throughout the state, including along the highway system of the state, the marine highway, and in rural areas of the state.

History.

(§ 5 ch 78 SLA 1988; am § 27 ch 23 SLA 1995; am § 4 ch 29 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 76 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For tourism grants, see 3 AAC 54.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective October 8, 2014, in the introductory language, substituted “AS

44.33.119

—

44.33.136

” for “AS

44.33.119

—

44.33.135

”.

Sec. 44.33.120.
Tourism duties.

[Repealed, § 84 ch 58 SLA 1999.]

The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall

cooperate with organizations in the private sector for the promotion and development of tourism into and within the state;

coordinate with municipal, state, and federal agencies for the development of tourism resources in the state;

promote and develop the state’s tourist industry;

cooperate with the private sector and the Alaska Tourism Marketing Board in the planning and execution of a destination tourism marketing campaign that is in the public interest;

promote the development of visitor industry facilities, both in the public sector and the private sector, through the use of state resources as appropriate;

plan and advocate for tourism and tourism development in coordination with the private sector, municipalities, state, and federal agencies;

administer a visitor information center located in Tok; and

conduct research related to tourism.

[Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]

[Repealed, § 5 ch 76 SLA 2014.]

History.

(§ 4 ch 207 SLA 1975; am § 72 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 6 ch 78 SLA 1988; am § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991; am §§ 5, 6 ch 29 SLA 1999; am §§ 58, 84 ch 58 SLA 1999; am §§ 2, 5 ch 76 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was substituted for “Alaska division of tourism” in subsection (b) and for “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” in subsection (d) in order to reconcile chs. 29 and 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in (b) and (d) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For tourism grants, see 3 AAC 54.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective October 8, 2014, in (b), in (b)(4), inserted “and the Alaska Tourism Marketing Board” following “the private sector” and deleted “under AS

44.33.125

” following “marketing campaign”, deleted (b)(7), which read “administer and evaluate the tourism marketing contract program under AS 44.55.125;”; repealed (d), and made related changes.

Sec. 44.33.122.
Establishment of Tourism Coordinating Committee. [Repealed, § 33 ch 23 SLA 1995.]

Sec. 44.33.124.
Membership of the Tourism Coordinating Committee. [Repealed, § 33 ch 23 SLA 1995.]

Sec. 44.33.125.
Tourism marketing contracts. [Repealed, § 5 ch 76 SLA 2014.]

Sec. 44.33.130.
Division contract. [Repealed, § 11 ch 78 SLA 1988.]

Sec. 44.33.135.
Grants for promotion or development of visitor travel.

A municipality, a nonprofit corporation formed under AS 10.20, or a bona fide nonprofit civic, fraternal, or service organization may receive, as a grant, matching money from the state for up to 50 percent of the costs of a program or project that the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development determines is consistent with the purposes of AS

44.33.119

and is likely to promote or develop visitor travel, including

the promotion of conventions;

the construction, improvement, or operation of visitor destination facilities and tourist attractions; and

the development and preservation of attractions of historical, contemporary, recreational, or cultural interest.

The commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development shall adopt regulations to carry out the provisions of this section.

A grant awarded under this section may not be used for tourism marketing.

History.

(§ 8 ch 78 SLA 1988; am § 9 ch 29 SLA 1999; am § 59 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (b) of this section, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in (a) and (b) of this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For tourism grants, see 3 AAC 54.

Sec. 44.33.136.
Alaska Tourism Marketing Board.

The Alaska Tourism Marketing Board is created in the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

The board consists of 21 members as follows:

18 members appointed by the governor who are members of the leading statewide nonprofit tourism association and who represent different segments of the tourism industry and company sizes and the following regions of the state:

Southeast;

Southcentral;

Southwest;

Interior; and

Far North;

the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development or the commissioner’s designee;

one member of the senate appointed by the president of the senate, who shall serve ex officio as a nonvoting member of the board; and

one member of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, who shall serve ex officio as a nonvoting member of the board.

Before making the appointments under (b)(1) of this section, the governor shall identify the leading statewide nonprofit tourism marketing association.

The governor may appoint the members under (b)(1) of this section from a list of nominees for each seat submitted by the leading statewide nonprofit tourism marketing association. The governor may reject a list for any seat submitted under this subsection and request that another list be submitted.

The term of office of a member of the board appointed under (b)(1) of this section is three years.

The board shall annually elect a chair and vice-chair from among its members. Nine members of the board including at least one member representing each region listed under (b)(1) of this section constitute a quorum. The board shall meet at least twice a year. The chair shall set the time and place of the meeting, either on the chair’s own motion or on written request by three members of the board. The board is encouraged to meet electronically.

The members of the board do not receive a salary for service on the board. The members of the board appointed under (b)(2) — (4) of this section are entitled to per diem and travel expenses authorized by law for other boards and commissions under AS

39.20.180

. The members of the board appointed under (b)(1) of this section are not entitled to per diem or travel expenses.

The board shall

cooperate with the department to plan and execute a destination tourism marketing campaign that is in the public interest; and

make recommendations to the department regarding tourism marketing.

In this section,

“board” means the Alaska Tourism Marketing Board;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

History.

(§ 3 ch 76 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For the termination date of the Alaska Tourism Marketing Board, see AS

44.66.010(a)

.

Effective dates. —

Section 3, ch. 76, SLA 2014, which enacted this section, took effect on October 8, 2014.

Secs. 44.33.140 — 44.33.180.
Grants; matching money; limitations; administration. [Repealed, § 11 ch 78 SLA 1988.]

Secs. 44.33.190 — 44.33.230.
Tourism Advisory Board. [Repealed, § 2 ch 97 SLA 1986.]